Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2802
County board of corrections; created; powers and duties.

In each county having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants, the county board shall also serve as the county board of corrections and in counties of less than one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants the county board may choose to serve as the county board of corrections. Any such county board of corrections shall have charge of the county jail and correctional facilities and of all persons by law confined in such jail or correctional facilities. Such county board of corrections shall comply with any rule prescribed by the Jail Standards Board pursuant to sections 47-101 to 47-104.

Laws 1974, LB 782, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 396, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 1.

Implement sentence reduction provision, see section 47-501.